Utah statutes.
53A-15-1205.    Authorized online course providers.

The following entities may offer online courses to eligible students through the Statewide Online Education Program:

(1)  beginning with the 2011-12 school year, a charter school or district school created exclusively for the purpose of serving students online; and

(2)  beginning with the 2011-12 school year, an LEA program, approved by the LEA's governing board, that is created exclusively for the purpose of serving students online.

